Hawaii statutes.
[§846-17 Administration of National Crime
Prevention and Privacy Compact.] (a) The Hawaii criminal justice
data center is the central repository of criminal history records for purposes
of the National Crime Prevention and Privacy Compact and shall do all things
necessary or incidental to carrying out the compact.

(b) The administrator of the Hawaii criminal
justice data center, or the administrator's designee, is the State's compact
officer and shall administer the compact within the State. The administrator
may adopt rules and establish procedures for the cooperative exchange of
criminal history records between this State and other state governments and
with the federal government for the use in noncriminal justice background
checks. [L 2006, c 83, §3]

Cross References

National Crime Prevention and Privacy Compact, see chapter
846C.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next